District of Columbia statutes.
3-1251.06

Notice of Program procedures.

Each nurse who requests to participate in the Program shall be informed in writing of the Program’s procedures, including the rights and responsibilities of the nurse, and the consequences of noncompliance with the procedures, including suspension and termination of the nursing license.

May 1, 2001, D.C. Law 13-297, § 7, 48 DCR 2036